District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

47-2853.45

Registration of firms of public accountants.

Repealed.

History

Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1002, 46 DCR 3142
June 16, 2006, D.C. Law 16-130, § 2(f), 53 DCR 4718

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-2853.45.

Temporary Legislation

Section 2(g) of D.C. Law 16-101 repealed this section.
Section 4(b) of D.C. Law 16-101 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 2(g) of Non-Health Related Occupations and Professions Licensure Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-255, January 26, 2006, 53 DCR 763).